Tennessee, session 114, SB0293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-1-408, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b) The state guard is a separate entity within the military department for
budgetary purposes.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0293
000194
- 1 -